Utah statutes.
63K-2-205.   Curtailment, adjustment and allocation of energy use by
executive orders -- Limitations and considerations in issuance and
application.
(1)  Upon issuance of a proclamation pursuant to Section 63K-2-204, the
governor in addition may by executive order:
(a)  require reduction in energy resource usage and the application of
conservation, prevention of waste, and the salvaging of energy resources and
the materials, services, and facilities derived therefrom or dependent
thereon, by state agencies and political subdivisions in this state;
(b)  direct the establishment by state agencies and political subdivisions in
this state of programs necessary to implement and comply with federal energy
conservation programs where these programs have not theretofore been so
established, including, but not limited to, allocation or rationing of energy
resources and the distribution of the state's discretionary allotments;
(c)  require involuntary curtailments, adjustments, or allocations in the
supply and consumption of energy resources applicable to all suppliers and
consumers including, but not limited to, specification of the times and manner
in which these resources are supplied or consumed; or
(d)  prescribe and direct activities promoting the conservation, prevention of
waste, and salvage of energy resources and the materials, services, and
facilities derived therefrom or dependent thereon, including, but not limited
to, the modification of transportation routes and schedules, or the suspension
of weight limits or other restrictions from the transportation of energy
resources, to the extent permissible under federal law and regulations.
(2)  Any restrictions, curtailments, adjustments, or allocations pursuant to
Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  be ordered and continue only so long as demonstrably necessary for the
maintenance of essential services or transportation, or the continued
operation of the economy but no longer than the duration of the proclamation;
(b)  be applied as uniformly as practicable within each class of suppliers and
consumers and without discrimination within a class; and
(c)  give due consideration to the needs of commercial, retail, professional,
and service establishments whose normal function is to supply goods or
services or both of an essential nature, including, but not limited to, food,
lodging, fuel, or medical care facilities during times of the day other than
conventional daytime working hours.
